Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 08.88.263.
License by endorsement.

A person who holds a valid active real estate license issued by another state shall be granted an equivalent Alaska real estate license if that person

passes the portion of the real estate examination which examines on state law;

meets the requirements of AS

08.88.171

; and

satisfies the educational requirements under AS

08.88.095(a)

if the person has not held the license issued by the other state for one year or more.

History.

(§ 25 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 34 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 11 ch 74 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

Secs. 08.88.270 — 08.88.280.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.281.
Real estate recovery fund.

Before issuing a license to an applicant under this chapter, the commission shall ensure that the applicant has complied with the provisions of AS

08.88.455

and is covered by the real estate recovery fund established in AS

08.88.450

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 143 SLA 1974; am § 7 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 19 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 113 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.88.290.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.291.
Location; contact information.

A person licensed as a real estate broker shall, by registering with the commission, inform the commission of the person’s principal office and of any branch offices of the person’s real estate business and include in the information the names of the real estate licensees who are employed at each office. A real estate licensee may do real estate business only through a principal office or from a branch office registered by the broker by whom the licensee is employed. Failure of a real estate broker to maintain a place of business in the state or to inform the commission of its location and the names and addresses of all real estate licensees employed at each location by the broker is grounds for the suspension or revocation of the broker’s license.

Each licensee under this chapter is responsible for ensuring that the commission has current contact information for the licensee for two years after the lapse, expiration, surrender, suspension, or revocation of the license.

In addition to the information provided under (a) of this section, a licensee shall provide the commission with a current mailing address and, if active, the address of the broker employing the licensee.

The commission shall mail all notices pertaining to a license or recovery fund action taken under this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter to the current address or addresses of a licensee obtained under this section. Proof of notice provided under this subsection satisfies due process notice requirements.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 14 ch 28 SLA 1974; am § 26 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 20 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 106 SLA 2004; am §§ 8, 9 ch 113 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

For place of business, see 12 AAC 64, art. 3.

Sec. 08.88.300.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.301.
Change of location.

Before a real estate broker changes the location of the broker’s principal office or of a branch office, the broker shall notify the commission of the new address and any other office changes on a form provided by the commission and pay the applicable fees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 15 ch 28 SLA 1974; am § 27 ch 167 SLA 1980; am § 21 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.88.305.
Multiple business operations.

A person licensed as a real estate broker may own, operate, or be employed by multiple corporations, partnerships, or other business organizations engaging in activities for which a license is required under this chapter, provided that each business organization is registered with the commission, and that the principal offices of all of the business organizations share a single physical address.

History.

(§ 7 ch 51 SLA 2007)

Sec. 08.88.310.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.311.
Branch offices.

A branch office shall be under the direct supervision of a real estate associate broker whose principal place of business is that office and who is licensed under this chapter. An associate broker may serve in the capacity of direct supervisor at only one office.

A branch office shall bear and be advertised only in the name of the principal office but may also indicate that it is a branch office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 8 ch 108 SLA 1970; am § 16 ch 28 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 174 SLA 1976; am § 22 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 64, art. 2.

For place of business, see 12 AAC 64, art. 3.

Sec. 08.88.320.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.321.
Possession and display of license certificates.

The license certificate of a real estate broker shall be displayed in the broker’s principal office.

The license certificate of each licensee working in the broker’s principal office shall be displayed in that office.

The license certificate of the designated associate broker who is in charge of a branch office and the certificate of each licensee working in a branch office shall be displayed in the branch office indicated as the office of the licensees’ employment in the registration required under AS

08.88.291

.

Certificates displayed under this section must be displayed where they are available for public clients and customers to verify the current active status of licensees working in the office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 23 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For place of business, see 12 AAC 64, art. 3.

Sec. 08.88.330.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.331.
Making of transactions.

An active real estate salesperson or associate real estate broker may perform activities for which a real estate license is required only through the real estate broker who employs or contracts with the licensee. All money or other proceeds collected in trust and related to a real estate transaction shall immediately be turned over to the broker or the broker’s authorized representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 24 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For place of business, see 12 AAC 64, art. 3.

For trust accounts, see 12 AAC 64, art. 5.

For property management, see 12 AAC 64, art. 9.

Sec. 08.88.340.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.341.
Listings or management contracts.

All real estate listings or management contracts must be in writing and must be signed by the broker or associated licensee of the broker and by the client or an authorized representative of the client for whose benefit the real estate licensee will act. All real estate exclusive listings or management contracts must have a definite expiration date that may be renewed or extended only by a written agreement signed by the client or the client’s authorized representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 25 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.88.350.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.351.
Accounts; records of transactions.

A real estate broker shall

keep a complete record, for three years, of all real estate transactions in which the broker or employed licensees of the broker engaged;

provide upon request to any principal in a transaction an accounting for all money or other property collected or held in the course of each transaction;

keep a separate trust account in a bank into which the broker shall deposit all earnest money deposits, purchase money, security deposits, contingency funds, collected rental money, rental receipts, or other money collected in trust until it is appropriate for the broker to distribute the money to the proper persons;

if authorized by the board of directors of a community association to collect, control, or disburse association funds, keep a separate account in a financial institution for the funds;

make available to the commission, on request, account records and all other documents that the commission may require in order to conduct an investigation or to audit an account required under this section;

if records are delivered to a partnership, corporation, or business entity other than another licensed broker upon termination of employment, ensure by contract the maintenance and availability of those records for a minimum of three years in accordance with this section.

A real estate licensee

shall keep, for a minimum of three years, a complete record of all real estate transactions in which the licensee was a principal;

who maintains records concerning management or sale of the licensee’s own properties or the licensee’s client properties separate from the broker’s file, shall retain those records for a minimum of three years;

shall make available to the commission, on request, records and other documents that the commission may require to conduct an investigation;

shall promptly deposit community association funds or proceeds from periodic community association assessments into either a community association reserve account or a community association operating account; if, at any time, the community association operating account contains more money than is estimated to be needed for budgeted expenditures for the subsequent three months, the licensee shall transfer the excess funds to the community association reserve account as soon as practicable;

may not commingle funds of a community association with funds of another community association or with the licensee’s funds.

For the purposes of this section, the three-year requirement for records maintenance begins at the initiation of a transaction and continues, as applicable, until three years after the date

a listing agreement ends;

a sales transaction closes or otherwise ends;

a management contract ends; or

another contractual or fiduciary obligation ends.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 17 ch 28 SLA 1974; am §§ 26, 27 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For place of business, see 12 AAC 64, art. 3.

For prohibited conduct, see 12 AAC 64, art. 4.

For trust accounts, see 12 AAC 64, art. 5.

For property management, see 12 AAC 64, art. 9.

Sec. 08.88.360.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.361.
When commission is earned.

A commission is earned when the real estate broker fulfills the terms of a written personal services contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 28 ch 167 SLA 1980)

Sec. 08.88.370.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.371.
[Renumbered as AS 08.88.071(c).]

Sec. 08.88.380.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.381.
Signs.

A real estate broker shall maintain a sign at each of the broker’s registered real estate offices prominently showing the name of the real estate business as registered with the commission. The required size, content, and location of signs under this section may be determined by the commission under regulations. The regulations must allow signs in offices located on premises with more restrictive sign requirements than would otherwise be applicable under the commission’s regulations to be considered to be in compliance with the regulations if the signs meet the requirements of the premises and the licensee submits a copy of the sign requirements of the premises to the commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 28 ch 45 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For place of business, see 12 AAC 64, art. 3.

Sec. 08.88.390.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.391.
Conflict of interest.

A real estate licensee who has a conflict of interest relating to a real estate transaction shall disclose that conflict of interest to the persons adversely affected by the conflict or their real estate licensees and confirm the conflict of interest in writing to the persons adversely affected by the conflict or their real estate licensees involved in the transaction as soon as possible after the conflict is identified. The licensee must also verbally advise the person of the conflict, and begin any written statement of the conflict of interest with these words, underlined and written in bold: “Disclosure of Conflict of Interest.”

The failure of a licensee to disclose a conflict of interest as required under this section does not give rise to a cause of action by a private person. However, the commission may, under AS

08.88.071

, impose a disciplinary sanction for violation of this section.

In this section, “conflict of interest” is when a licensee

has a present ownership or leasehold interest in the property that is the subject of a transaction;

is whole or part owner of a business interest in the property being marketed or considered for purchase or lease;

represents a relative, as defined in AS

08.88.900(a)(19)

, or a person with whom the licensee has a financial relationship if the relative or person has a present financial interest in the property being marketed or considered for purchase or lease;

receives compensation from someone other than a party to the contract or another party having a financial interest in the transaction; or

receives compensation for community association management while simultaneously engaged as a property manager for a unit within the community association.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am §§ 29, 30 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 105 SLA 2004; am § 10 ch 113 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in (c)(3) of this section, “AS

08.88.900(a)(19)

” was substituted for “AS

08.88.900

(19)” in order to reflect the 1998 addition of AS

08.88.900

(b).

Administrative Code. —

For property management, see 12 AAC 64, art. 9.

Sec. 08.88.396.
Licensee relationships, disclosures, and activity before January 1, 2005.

A person licensed under this chapter shall, when acting as a real estate licensee for a prospective seller or lessor of real estate,

disclose in writing the licensee’s agency relationship with the seller or lessor to each prospective buyer or lessee at the time that the licensee begins to provide specific assistance to locate or acquire real estate for the buyer or lessee, and obtain from each prospective buyer or lessee a signed acknowledgment that the buyer or lessee is aware of the agency relationship between the licensee and the seller or lessor; and

include in the purchase agreement a statement of the agency relationship between the licensee and the seller or lessor.

A person licensed under this chapter shall, when acting as a real estate licensee for a prospective buyer or lessee of real estate,

disclose the licensee’s relationship with the buyer or lessee to a prospective seller or lessor of real estate, or to the seller’s or lessor’s real estate licensee, at the time of the initial contact between the licensee and the prospective seller or lessor, or the seller’s or lessor’s real estate licensee, and confirm the relationship in writing as soon as possible after the initial contact;

include in the purchase agreement a statement of the agency relationship between the licensee and the buyer or lessee;

if the prospective seller or lessor has an unexpired exclusive listing contract for a property, present all offers to purchase that property through the seller’s or lessor’s real estate licensee; and

disclose in writing to all parties to a transaction when the licensee’s compensation as real estate licensee for the buyer or lessee is to be paid by anyone other than the buyer or lessee being represented by the licensee.

A person licensed under this chapter may act as a real estate licensee for both a prospective seller or lessor and a prospective buyer or lessee of real estate only after the licensee informs both the seller or lessor and the buyer or lessee of the dual agency representation and obtains written consent to the dual agency representation from both principals.

When a change occurs during a transaction that makes a prior written disclosure required by this section incomplete, misleading, or inaccurate, the licensee shall make a revised disclosure, in writing, to all parties to the transaction as soon as possible. The revised disclosure must include the date of the revision and shall be acknowledged in writing by all the parties. However, until the nature of the licensee’s relationship with a party is completely established, a revised disclosure is not required under this subsection if the licensee obtains from the party a written preauthorized consent to changes before the changes occur.

In a civil action for the failure of a licensee to comply with the provisions of this section, the plaintiff’s remedy is limited to the recovery of actual damages. This subsection does not limit a person’s ability to take any other action or pursue any other remedy to which the person may be entitled under other law.

This section applies only to acts that occur before January 1, 2005.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 1990; am § 31 ch 45 SLA 1998; am §§ 3, 4 ch 128 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 105 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 5(a), ch. 128, SLA 2003, the provisions of the 2003 amendments of this section apply to a real estate transaction that occurs before, on, or after June 29, 2003.
Under § 5(b), ch. 128, SLA 2003, subsection (e) also applies to an action pending in a court in the state in which a final judgment has not been rendered before June 29, 2003.

Sec. 08.88.398.
Licensed assistants.

A licensed real estate salesperson or licensed associate real estate broker may act as a licensed assistant to another licensed salesperson or associate real estate broker only if

the licensed assistant and the salesperson or associate broker are both employed by the same broker;

the licensed assistant is not employed to perform activities requiring licensure under this chapter for more than one licensed real estate broker;

the employment arrangement between the licensed assistant and the salesperson or associate real estate broker is in writing and conforms to the applicable state and federal regulations regarding employment;

the employment of the licensed assistant is approved in writing by the broker who employs both the salesperson or associate real estate broker and the licensed assistant;

the salesperson or associate real estate broker who employs the licensed assistant agrees to be responsible for paying the licensed assistant’s wages and appropriate taxes and completing the appropriate state and federal tax forms; and

the broker of the salesperson or associate real estate broker who employs the licensed assistant agrees to be liable for the actions of the licensed assistant.

History.

(§ 32 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.88.400.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.401.
Prohibited conduct; penalties.

A person licensed under this chapter may not falsely represent to

have been awarded a degree or other designation;

be a member or an affiliate of a professional organization; or

be a member of a franchise or other business association.

A person

who is not a real estate broker licensed in this state may not accept a fee or a commission for performance of an act for which a license is required by this chapter except that a real estate broker validly licensed in another state may accept a fee or commission or a portion of a fee or commission for assisting a real estate broker licensed in this state in the performance of an act for which a license is required by this chapter;

who is an associate broker or a real estate salesperson licensed in this state may accept a fee or commission for performance of an act for which a license is required by this chapter only from the licensee’s employing broker, except that the wages of a person who is engaged as a licensed assistant under AS

08.88.398

may be accepted by the person from the assistant’s employer.

A person licensed under this chapter may not knowingly make, authorize, direct, or aid in the publication of a false statement or misrepresentation concerning land or a subdivision or other real estate offered for sale, lease, or rent or concerning an association being managed.

A person licensed under this chapter may not knowingly pay any part of a fee, commission, or other compensation received by the licensee in buying, selling, exchanging, leasing, auctioning, or renting real estate to

a person who is not licensed under this chapter, except as provided in (e) of this section;

another licensee, except through the licensee’s responsible broker; or

another licensee knowing that the other licensee intends to pay all or a portion of that which is received to a person who is not licensed under this chapter.

The prohibition of (d)(1) of this section does not prohibit

payments by a licensee to a person licensed to perform real estate activities in another jurisdiction if the other person has assisted the licensee in the performance of an act for which a license is required by this chapter;

payments from a real estate licensee to a principal as part of the resolution of a dispute regarding the terms of a transaction or regarding the property transferred; or

contributions from a licensee to a charitable organization and advertisement of the licensee’s intent to make the charitable donation.

A person may not

use or attempt to use a license issued under this chapter that was issued to another person;

give false or forged evidence to the commission or to a representative of the commission in an attempt to obtain a license;

impersonate an applicant under this chapter;

knowingly use or attempt to use an expired, suspended, revoked, or nonexistent license; or

falsely claim to be licensed and authorized to practice under this chapter.

A person who violates this section or AS

08.88.161

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1964; am § 6 ch 130 SLA 1966; am § 18 ch 28 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 143 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 96 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 113 SLA 1990; am §§ 33, 34 ch 45 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 105 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 37 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (d)-(f) were enacted as (e)-(g), respectively. Relettered in 1998, at which time former subsection (d) was relettered as (g) and internal references were conformed in (d)(1) and (e).

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For prohibited conduct, see 12 AAC 64, art. 4.

For trust accounts, see 12 AAC 64, art. 5.

Sec. 08.88.403.
Review of transactions.

A real estate broker may contract with and pay an attorney or associate broker to assist the broker to review a real estate transaction before the transaction closes.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 2005)

Sec. 08.88.405.
Preparation of documents.

Notwithstanding AS 08.08, a person licensed as a real estate broker, associate real estate broker, or real estate salesperson under this chapter may prepare real property contracts, earnest money agreements, leases, and other documents related to real property if the documents are prepared by the person in the course of the person’s work as a licensed real estate broker, associate real estate broker, or real estate salesperson under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1996)

Secs. 08.88.410 — 08.88.420.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.421.
[Renumbered as AS 08.88.900.]

Sec. 08.88.430.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 08.88.431.
[Renumbered as AS 08.88.990.]

Sec. 08.88.440.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 95 SLA 1964.]